North Dakota, session 69, HB1438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY - HISTORIC THEATER
RESTORATION GRANT PROGRAM - MATCHING FUNDS REQUIREMENT - ONE-TIME
FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury,
not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,100,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the state historical society for the purpose of providing a grant to an organization
dedicated to the restoration of a historic theater in a city with a population of more than 100,000,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The state historical society
may spend the funds identified in this section only to the extent the organization has secured
one dollar in matching moneys for every two dollars from nonstate sources. This funding is
considered a one-time funding item.
Page No. 1 25.0565.03000